src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_odd_havittaat_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - hävittäät - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     hävittäät+V+Inf: hävittäät
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hävitän
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hävität
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hävittää
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hävitämmä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hävitättä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hävitethään
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hävitin
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hävitit
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hävitti
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hävitimmä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hävitittä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hävitethiin
     hävittäät+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hävittänny
     hävittäät+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hävitetty
     hävittäät+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hävittänheet
     hävittäät+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hävittäävä
     hävittäät+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hävittäävät
     hävittäät+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hävitettävä
     hävittäät+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hävitettävät
     
     hävittäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: hävittäisin
     hävittäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: hävittäisit
     hävittäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: hävittäis
     hävittäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: hävittäisimä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: hävittäisittä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: hävitettäis
     hävittäät+V+Pass+Cond: hävitettäis

     hävittäät+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: hävitä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: hävittäkkää
     
     hävittäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: hävittämässä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: hävittämästä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: hävittämhään
     hävittäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: hävittämälä
     hävittäät+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: hävittämättä
